Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202145-918
Annual percentage rate; violation; effect; fee; limitation.

(1) A licensee shall not impose an annual percentage rate greater than thirty-six percent in connection with a delayed deposit transaction. Any delayed deposit transaction made in violation of this section is void, and the licensee making such delayed deposit transaction has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, fees, or any other charges in connection with such delayed deposit transaction.

(2) The fees set forth in this section shall not be charged to individuals on active duty military or their spouses or dependents in an amount that exceeds what is allowed under 10 U.S.C. 987, as such section existed on January 1, 2018.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 18;

Laws 2018, LB194, § 9;

Initiative Law 2020, No. 428, § 1.